Illinois, session 104th, HB3657.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Sections 5-238 and 6-229 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/5-238)7    Sec. 5-238. Provisions applicable to new hires; Tier 2. 8    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 9the provisions of this Section apply to a person who first 10becomes a policeman under this Article on or after January 1, 112011, and to certain qualified survivors of such a policeman. 12Such persons, and the benefits and restrictions that apply 13specifically to them under this Article, may be referred to as 14"Tier 2".15    (b) A policeman who has withdrawn from service, has 16attained age 50 or more, and has 10 or more years of service in 17that capacity shall be entitled, upon proper application being 18received by the Fund, to receive a Tier 2 monthly retirement 19annuity for his service as a police officer. The Tier 2 monthly 20retirement annuity shall be computed by multiplying 2.5% for 21each year of such service by his or her final average salary, 22subject to an annuity reduction factor of one-half of 1% for 23each month that the police officer's age at retirement is   HB3657 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1under age 55. The Tier 2 monthly retirement annuity is in lieu 2of any age and service annuity or other form of retirement 3annuity under this Article.4    The maximum retirement annuity under this subsection (b) 5shall be 75% of final average salary.6    For the purposes of this subsection (b), "final average 7salary" means the greater of: (i) the average monthly salary 8obtained by dividing the total salary of the policeman during 9the 96 consecutive months of service within the last 120 10months of service in which the total salary was the highest by 11the number of months of service in that period; or (ii) the 12average monthly salary obtained by dividing the total salary 13of the policeman during the 48 consecutive months of service 14within the last 60 months of service in which the total salary 15was the highest by the number of months of service in that 16period. 17    Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under this 18Code (including without limitation the calculation of benefits 19and employee contributions), the annual salary based on the 20plan year of a member or participant to whom this Section 21applies shall not exceed $106,800; however, beginning July 1, 222025, the annual salary shall not exceed $141,407.74 and that 23amount shall annually thereafter be increased by the lesser of 24(i) 3% of that amount, including all previous adjustments, or 25(ii) one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but 26not less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12   HB3657 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1months ending with the September preceding each November 1, 2including all previous adjustments. 3    Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 104th General 4Assembly shall cause or otherwise result in any retroactive 5adjustment of any employee contributions. 6    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 7for a person who first becomes a policeman under this Article 8on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for and the amount of 9the annuity to which the qualified surviving spouse, children, 10and parents are entitled under this subsection (c) shall be 11determined as follows:12        (1) The surviving spouse of a deceased policeman to 13    whom this Section applies shall be deemed qualified to 14    receive a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under this 15    paragraph (1) if: (i) the deceased policeman meets the 16    requirements specified under subdivision (A), (B), (C), or 17    (D) of this paragraph (1); and (ii) the surviving spouse 18    would not otherwise be excluded from receiving a widow's 19    annuity under the eligibility requirements for a widow's 20    annuity set forth in Section 5-146. The Tier 2 surviving 21    spouse's annuity is in lieu of the widow's annuity 22    determined under any other Section of this Article and is 23    subject to the requirements of Section 5-147.1.24        As used in this subsection (c), "earned annuity" means 25    a Tier 2 monthly retirement annuity determined under 26    subsection (b) of this Section, including any increases   HB3657 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1    the policeman had received pursuant to Section 5-167.1. 2            (A) If the deceased policeman was receiving an 3        earned annuity at the date of his or her death, the 4        Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under this paragraph 5        (1) shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 6        policeman's earned annuity at the date of death.7            If the deceased policeman was a parent of a child 8        or children, including any child who has been 9        conceived but not yet born, and there is a surviving 10        spouse, 12% of the policeman's earned annuity at the 11        date of death shall be granted to the guardian of any 12        such minor child or children for each such child until 13        attainment of age 18. Upon the death of the surviving 14        spouse leaving one or more children under the age of 15        18, or upon the death of a policeman leaving one or 16        more children under the age of 18 but no surviving 17        spouse, a monthly pension of 20% of the policeman's 18        monthly salary at the date of death shall be granted to 19        the duly appointed guardian of each such child for the 20        support and maintenance of each such child until the 21        child reaches age 18. The benefit in this paragraph is 22        in lieu of a benefit under paragraph (2) of this 23        subsection (c) but does not apply if the beneficiary 24        is entitled to receive a greater benefit under 25        paragraph (2) of this subsection (c). 26            (B) If the deceased policeman was not receiving an   HB3657 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        earned annuity but had at least 10 years of service at 2        the time of death, the Tier 2 surviving spouse's 3        annuity under this paragraph (1) shall be the greater 4        of: (i) 30% of the annual maximum salary attached to 5        the classified civil service position of a first class 6        patrolman at the time of his death; (ii) 54% of the 7        policeman's monthly salary at the time of the 8        policeman's death; or (iii) (ii) 66 2/3% of the Tier 2 9        monthly retirement annuity that the deceased policeman 10        would have been eligible to receive under subsection 11        (b) of this Section, based upon the actual service 12        accrued through the day before the policeman's death, 13        but determined as though the policeman was at least 14        age 55 on the day before his or her death and retired 15        on that day.16            If the deceased policeman was a parent of a child 17        or children, including any child who has been 18        conceived but not yet born, and there is a surviving 19        spouse, 12% of the policeman's monthly salary at the 20        date of death shall be granted to the guardian of any 21        such minor child or children for each such child until 22        attainment of age 18. Upon the death of the surviving 23        spouse leaving one or more children under the age of 24        18, or upon the death of a policeman leaving one or 25        more children under the age of 18 but no surviving 26        spouse, a monthly pension of 20% of the policeman's   HB3657 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        monthly salary at the date of death shall be granted to 2        the duly appointed guardian of each such child for the 3        support and maintenance of each such child until the 4        child reaches age 18. The benefit in this paragraph is 5        in lieu of a benefit under paragraph (2) of this 6        subsection (c) but does not apply if the beneficiary 7        is entitled to receive a greater benefit under 8        paragraph (2) of this subsection (c). 9            (C) If the deceased policeman was an active 10        policeman with at least 1 1/2 but less than 10 years of 11        service at the time of death, the Tier 2 surviving 12        spouse's annuity under this paragraph (1) shall be the 13        greater of: (i) in the amount of 30% of the annual 14        maximum salary attached to the classified civil 15        service position of a first class patrolman at the 16        time of his death; or (ii) 54% of the policeman's 17        monthly salary at the time of the policeman's death.18            If the deceased policeman was a parent of a child 19        or children, including any child who has been 20        conceived but not yet born, and there is a surviving 21        spouse, 12% of the policeman's monthly salary at the 22        date of death shall be granted to the guardian of any 23        such minor child or children for each such child until 24        attainment of age 18. Upon the death of the surviving 25        spouse leaving one or more children under the age of 26        18, or upon the death of a policeman leaving one or   HB3657 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        more children under the age of 18 but no surviving 2        spouse, a monthly pension of 20% of the policeman's 3        monthly salary at the date of death shall be granted to 4        the duly appointed guardian of each such child for the 5        support and maintenance of each such child until the 6        child reaches age 18. The benefit in this paragraph is 7        in lieu of a benefit under paragraph (2) of this 8        subsection (c) but does not apply if the beneficiary 9        is entitled to receive a greater benefit under 10        paragraph (2) of this subsection (c). 11            (D) If the performance of an act or acts of duty 12        results directly in the death of a policeman subject 13        to this Section, or prevents him from subsequently 14        resuming active service in the police department, and 15        if the policeman's Tier 2 surviving spouse would 16        otherwise meet the eligibility requirements for a 17        compensation annuity or supplemental annuity granted 18        under Section 5-144, then in addition to the Tier 2 19        surviving spouse's annuity provided under subdivision 20        (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph (1), whichever 21        applies, the Tier 2 surviving spouse shall be 22        qualified to receive compensation annuity or 23        supplemental annuity, as would be provided under 24        Section 5-144, in order to bring the total benefit up 25        to the applicable 75% salary limitation provided in 26        that Section, but subject to the Tier 2 salary cap   HB3657 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        provided under subsection (b) of this Section; except 2        that no such annuity shall be paid to the surviving 3        spouse of a policeman who dies while in receipt of 4        disability benefits when the policeman's death was 5        caused by an intervening illness or injury unrelated 6        to the illness or injury that had prevented him from 7        subsequently resuming active service in the police 8        department. 9            (E) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 10        Article, the monthly Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity 11        under subdivision (A) or (B) of this paragraph (1) 12        shall be increased on the January 1 next occurring 13        after (i) attainment of age 60 by the recipient of the 14        Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity or (ii) the first 15        anniversary of the Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity 16        start date, whichever is later, and on each January 1 17        thereafter, by 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted 18        percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the 19        consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with 20        the September preceding each November 1, whichever is 21        less, of the originally granted Tier 2 surviving 22        spouse's annuity. If the unadjusted percentage change 23        in the consumer price index-u for a 12-month period 24        ending in September is zero or, when compared with the 25        preceding period, decreases, then the annuity shall 26        not be increased.  HB3657 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1            For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price 2        index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of 3        Labor Statistics of the United States Department of 4        Labor that measures the average change in prices of 5        goods and services purchased by all urban consumers, 6        United States city average, all items, 1982-84 = 100. 7        The new amount resulting from each annual adjustment 8        shall be determined by the Public Pension Division of 9        the Department of Insurance and made available to the 10        boards of the pension funds.11            (F) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this 12        paragraph (1), for a qualified surviving spouse who is 13        entitled to a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under 14        subdivision (A), (B), (C), or (D) of this paragraph 15        (1), that Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity shall not 16        be less than the amount of the minimum widow's annuity 17        established from time to time under Section 5-167.4.18        (2) Surviving children of a deceased policeman subject 19    to this Section who would otherwise meet the eligibility 20    requirements for a child's annuity set forth in Sections 21    5-151 and 5-152 shall be deemed qualified to receive a 22    Tier 2 child's annuity under this subsection (c), which 23    shall be in lieu of, but in the same amount and paid in the 24    same manner as, the child's annuity provided under those 25    Sections; except that any salary used for computing a Tier 26    2 child's annuity shall be subject to the Tier 2 salary cap   HB3657 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1    provided under subsection (b) of this Section. For 2    purposes of determining any pro rata reduction in child's 3    annuities under this subsection (c), references in Section 4    5-152 to the combined annuities of the family shall be 5    deemed to refer to the combined Tier 2 surviving spouse's 6    annuity, if any, and the Tier 2 child's annuities payable 7    under this subsection (c).8        (3) Surviving parents of a deceased policeman subject 9    to this Section who would otherwise meet the eligibility 10    requirements for a parent's annuity set forth in Section 11    5-152 shall be deemed qualified to receive a Tier 2 12    parent's annuity under this subsection (c), which shall be 13    in lieu of, but in the same amount and paid in the same 14    manner as, the parent's annuity provided under Section 15    5-152.1; except that any salary used for computing a Tier 16    2 parent's annuity shall be subject to the Tier 2 salary 17    cap provided under subsection (b) of this Section. For the 18    purposes of this Section, a reference to "annuity" in 19    Section 5-152.1 includes: (i) in the context of a widow, a 20    Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity and (ii) in the context 21    of a child, a Tier 2 child's annuity.22    Notwithstanding Section 1-103.1, the changes made to this 23subsection by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 24Assembly apply without regard to whether the deceased 25policeman was in service on or after the effective date of this 26amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. The changes made   HB3657 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall not 2diminish the survivor's benefits described in this Section. 3    (d) The General Assembly finds and declares that the 4provisions of this Section, as enacted by Public Act 96-1495, 5require clarification relating to necessary eligibility 6standards and the manner of determining and paying the 7intended Tier 2 benefits and contributions in order to enable 8the Fund to unambiguously implement and administer benefits 9for Tier 2 members. The changes to this Section and the 10conforming changes to Sections 5-153, 5-155, 5-163, 5-167.1 11(except for the changes to subsection (a) of that Section), 125-169, and 5-170 made by this amendatory Act of the 99th 13General Assembly are enacted to clarify the provisions of this 14Section as enacted by Public Act 96-1495, and are hereby 15declared to represent and be consistent with the original and 16continuing intent of this Section and Public Act 96-1495.17    (e) The changes to Sections 5-153, 5-155, 5-163, 5-167.1 18(except for the changes to subsection (a) of that Section), 195-169, and 5-170 made by this amendatory Act of the 99th 20General Assembly are intended to be retroactive to January 1, 212011 (the effective date of Public Act 96-1495) and, for the 22purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, they apply without 23regard to whether the relevant policeman was in service on or 24after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 99th 25General Assembly. 26(Source: P.A. 99-905, eff. 11-29-16.)   HB3657 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1    (40 ILCS 5/6-229)2    Sec. 6-229. Provisions applicable to new hires; Tier 2.3    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 4the provisions of this Section apply to a person who first 5becomes a fireman under this Article on or after January 1, 62011, and to certain qualified survivors of such a fireman. 7Such persons, and the benefits and restrictions that apply 8specifically to them under this Article, may be referred to as 9"Tier 2".10    (b) A fireman who has withdrawn from service, has attained 11age 50 or more, and has 10 or more years of service in that 12capacity shall be entitled, upon proper application being 13received by the Fund, to receive a Tier 2 monthly retirement 14annuity for his service as a fireman. The Tier 2 monthly 15retirement annuity shall be computed by multiplying 2.5% for 16each year of such service by his or her final average salary, 17subject to an annuity reduction factor of one-half of 1% for 18each month that the fireman's age at retirement is under age 1955. The Tier 2 monthly retirement annuity is in lieu of any age 20and service annuity or other form of retirement annuity under 21this Article.22    The maximum retirement annuity under this subsection (b) 23shall be 75% of final average salary.24    For the purposes of this subsection (b), "final average 25salary" means the greater of (1) the average monthly salary   HB3657 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1obtained by dividing the total salary of the fireman during 2the 96 consecutive months of service within the last 120 3months of service in which the total salary was the highest by 4the number of months of service in that period or (2) the 5average monthly salary obtained by dividing the total salary 6of the fireman during the 48 consecutive months of service 7within the last 60 months of service in which the total salary 8was the highest by the number of months of service in that 9period.10    Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under this 11Code (including without limitation the calculation of benefits 12and employee contributions), the annual salary based on the 13plan year of a member or participant to whom this Section 14applies shall not exceed $106,800; however, beginning July 1, 152025, the annual salary shall not exceed $141,407.74 and that 16amount shall annually thereafter be increased by the lesser of 17(i) 3% of that amount, including all previous adjustments, or 18(ii) one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but 19not less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 20months ending with the September preceding each November 1, 21including all previous adjustments.22    Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 104th General 23Assembly shall cause or otherwise result in any retroactive 24adjustment of any employee contributions. 25    (b-5) For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price 26index-u" means the index published by the Bureau of Labor   HB3657 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1Statistics of the United States Department of Labor that 2measures the average change in prices of goods and services 3purchased by all urban consumers, United States city average, 4all items, 1982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each 5annual adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension 6Division of the Department of Insurance and made available to 7the boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by 8November 1 of each year. 9    (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Article, 10for a person who first becomes a fireman under this Article on 11or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for and the amount of the 12annuity to which the qualified surviving spouse, children, and 13parents of the fireman are entitled under this subsection (c) 14shall be determined as follows:15        (1) The surviving spouse of a deceased fireman to whom 16    this Section applies shall be deemed qualified to receive 17    a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under this paragraph 18    (1) if: (i) the deceased fireman meets the requirements 19    specified under subdivision (A), (B), (C), or (D) of this 20    paragraph (1); and (ii) the surviving spouse would not 21    otherwise be excluded from receiving a widow's annuity 22    under the eligibility requirements for a widow's annuity 23    set forth in Section 6-142. The Tier 2 surviving spouse's 24    annuity is in lieu of the widow's annuity determined under 25    any other Section of this Article and is subject to the 26    requirements of Section 6-143.2.  HB3657 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        As used in this subsection (c), "earned pension" means 2    a Tier 2 monthly retirement annuity determined under 3    subsection (b) of this Section, including any increases 4    the fireman had received pursuant to Section 6-164. 5            (A) If the deceased fireman was receiving an 6        earned pension at the date of his or her death, the 7        Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under this paragraph 8        (1) shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the fireman's 9        earned pension at the date of death.10            If the deceased fireman was a parent of a child or 11        children, including any child who has been conceived 12        but not yet born, and there is a surviving spouse, 12% 13        of the fireman's earned annuity at the date of death 14        shall be granted to the guardian of any such minor 15        child or children for each such child until attainment 16        of age 18. Upon the death of the surviving spouse 17        leaving one or more children under the age of 18, or 18        upon the death of a fireman leaving one or more 19        children under the age of 18 but no surviving spouse, a 20        monthly pension of 20% of the fireman's monthly salary 21        at the date of death shall be granted to the duly 22        appointed guardian of each such child for the support 23        and maintenance of each such child until the child 24        reaches age 18. The benefit in this paragraph is in 25        lieu of a benefit under paragraph (2) of this 26        subsection (c) but does not apply if the beneficiary   HB3657 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        is entitled to receive a greater benefit under 2        paragraph (2) of this subsection (c). 3            (B) If the deceased fireman was not receiving an 4        earned pension but had at least 10 years of service at 5        the time of death, the Tier 2 surviving spouse's 6        annuity under this paragraph (1) shall be the greater 7        of: (i) 30% of the salary attached to the rank of first 8        class firefighter in the classified career service at 9        the time of the fireman's death; (ii) 54% of the 10        fireman's monthly salary at the time of the fireman's 11        death; or (iii) (ii) 66 2/3% of the Tier 2 monthly 12        retirement annuity that the deceased fireman would 13        have been eligible to receive under subsection (b) of 14        this Section, based upon the actual service accrued 15        through the day before the fireman's death, but 16        determined as though the fireman was at least age 55 on 17        the day before his or her death and retired on that 18        day.19            If the deceased fireman was a parent of a child or 20        children, including any child who has been conceived 21        but not yet born, and there is a surviving spouse, 12% 22        of the fireman's monthly salary at the date of death 23        shall be granted to the guardian of any such minor 24        child or children for each such child until attainment 25        of age 18. Upon the death of the surviving spouse 26        leaving one or more children under the age of 18, or   HB3657 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        upon the death of a fireman leaving one or more 2        children under the age of 18 but no surviving spouse, a 3        monthly pension of 20% of the fireman's monthly salary 4        at the date of death shall be granted to the duly 5        appointed guardian of each such child for the support 6        and maintenance of each such child until the child 7        reaches age 18. The benefit in this paragraph is in 8        lieu of a benefit under paragraph (2) of this 9        subsection (c) but does not apply if the beneficiary 10        is entitled to receive a greater benefit under 11        paragraph (2) of this subsection (c). 12            (C) If the deceased fireman was an active fireman 13        with at least 1 1/2 but less than 10 years of service 14        at the time of death, the Tier 2 surviving spouse's 15        annuity under this paragraph (1) shall be the greater 16        of: (i) in the amount of 30% of the salary attached to 17        the rank of first class firefighter in the classified 18        career service at the time of the fireman's death; or 19        (ii) 54% of the fireman's monthly salary at the time of 20        the fireman's death.21            If the deceased fireman was a parent of a child or 22        children, including any child who has been conceived 23        but not yet born, and there is a surviving spouse, 12% 24        of the fireman's monthly salary at the date of death 25        shall be granted to the guardian of any such minor 26        child or children for each such child until attainment   HB3657 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        of age 18. Upon the death of the surviving spouse 2        leaving one or more children under the age of 18, or 3        upon the death of a fireman leaving one or more 4        children under the age of 18 but no surviving spouse, a 5        monthly pension of 20% of the fireman's monthly salary 6        at the date of death shall be granted to the duly 7        appointed guardian of each such child for the support 8        and maintenance of each such child until the child 9        reaches age 18. The benefit in this paragraph is in 10        lieu of a benefit under paragraph (2) of this 11        subsection (c) but does not apply if the beneficiary 12        is entitled to receive a greater benefit under 13        paragraph (2) of this subsection (c). 14            (D) Notwithstanding subdivisions (A), (B), and (C) 15        of this paragraph (1), if the performance of an act or 16        acts of duty results directly in the death of a fireman 17        subject to this Section, or prevents him from 18        subsequently resuming active service in the fire 19        department, then a surviving spouse who would 20        otherwise meet the eligibility requirements for a 21        death in the line of duty widow's annuity granted 22        under Section 6-140 shall be deemed to be qualified 23        for a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under this 24        subdivision (D); except that no such annuity shall be 25        paid to the surviving spouse of a fireman who dies 26        while in receipt of disability benefits when the   HB3657 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        fireman's death was caused by an intervening illness 2        or injury unrelated to the illness or injury that had 3        prevented him from subsequently resuming active 4        service in the fire department. The Tier 2 surviving 5        spouse's annuity calculated under this subdivision (D) 6        shall be in lieu of, but in the same amount and paid in 7        the same manner as, the widow's annuity provided under 8        Section 6-140; except that the salary used for 9        computing a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under 10        this subdivision (D) shall be subject to the Tier 2 11        salary cap provided under subsection (b) of this 12        Section.13            (E) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 14        Article, the monthly Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity 15        under subdivision (A) or (B) of this paragraph (1) 16        shall be increased on the January 1 next occurring 17        after (i) attainment of age 60 by the recipient of the 18        Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity or (ii) the first 19        anniversary of the Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity 20        start date, whichever is later, and on each January 1 21        thereafter, by 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted 22        percentage increase in the consumer price index-u for 23        the 12 months ending with September preceding each 24        November 1, whichever is less, of the originally 25        granted Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity. If the 26        annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer   HB3657 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1        price index-u for a 12-month period ending in 2        September is zero or, when compared with the preceding 3        period, decreases, then the annuity shall not be 4        increased.5            (F) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this 6        paragraph (1), for a qualified surviving spouse who is 7        entitled to a Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity under 8        subdivision (A), (B), (C), or (D) of this paragraph 9        (1), that Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity shall not 10        be less than the amount of the minimum widow's annuity 11        established from time to time under Section 6-128.4.12        (2) Surviving children of a deceased fireman subject 13    to this Section who would otherwise meet the eligibility 14    requirements for a child's annuity set forth in Sections 15    6-147 and 6-148 shall be deemed qualified to receive a 16    Tier 2 child's annuity under this subsection (c), which 17    shall be in lieu of, but in the same amount and paid in the 18    same manner as, the child's annuity provided under those 19    Sections; except that any salary used for computing a Tier 20    2 child's annuity shall be subject to the Tier 2 salary cap 21    provided under subsection (b) of this Section. For 22    purposes of determining any pro rata reduction in child's 23    annuities under this subsection (c), references in Section 24    6-148 to the combined annuities of the family shall be 25    deemed to refer to the combined Tier 2 surviving spouse's 26    annuity, if any, and the Tier 2 child's annuities payable   HB3657 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1    under this subsection (c).2        (3) Surviving parents of a deceased fireman subject to 3    this Section who would otherwise meet the eligibility 4    requirements for a parent's annuity set forth in Section 5    6-149 shall be deemed qualified to receive a Tier 2 6    parent's annuity under this subsection (c), which shall be 7    in lieu of, but in the same amount and paid in the same 8    manner as, the parent's annuity provided under Section 9    6-149; except that any salary used for computing a Tier 2 10    parent's annuity shall be subject to the Tier 2 salary cap 11    provided under subsection (b) of this Section. For the 12    purposes of this Section, a reference to "annuity" in 13    Section 6-149 includes: (i) in the context of a widow, a 14    Tier 2 surviving spouse's annuity and (ii) in the context 15    of a child, a Tier 2 child's annuity.16    Notwithstanding Section 1-103.1, the changes made to this 17subsection by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 18Assembly apply without regard to whether the deceased fireman 19was in service on or after the effective date of this 20amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. The changes made 21by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall not 22diminish the survivor's benefits described in this Section. 23    (d) The General Assembly finds and declares that the 24provisions of this Section, as enacted by Public Act 96-1495, 25require clarification relating to necessary eligibility 26standards and the manner of determining and paying the   HB3657 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b1intended Tier 2 benefits and contributions in order to enable 2the Fund to unambiguously implement and administer benefits 3for Tier 2 members. The changes to this Section and the 4conforming changes to Sections 6-150, 6-158, 6-164 (except for 5the changes to subsection (a) of that Section), 6-166, and 66-167 made by this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly 7are enacted to clarify the provisions of this Section as 8enacted by Public Act 96-1495, and are hereby declared to 9represent and be consistent with the original and continuing 10intent of this Section and Public Act 96-1495.11    (e) The changes to Sections 6-150, 6-158, 6-164 (except 12for the changes to subsection (a) of that Section), 6-166, and 136-167 made by this amendatory Act of the 99th General Assembly 14are intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the 15effective date of Public Act 96-1495) and, for the purposes of 16Section 1-103.1 of this Code, they apply without regard to 17whether the relevant fireman was in service on or after the 18effective date of this amendatory Act of the 99th General 19Assembly. 20(Source: P.A. 103-579, eff. 12-8-23.) 21    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 22Section 8.49 as follows: 23    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)24    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and   HB3657 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 08622 RPS 18674 b18 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 2the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 3Act of the 104th General Assembly. 4    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 5becoming law.